Massachusetts, session 194th, S1747.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 147 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:-
Section 64. Identification Cards
Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, or their status as
a special state police officer, all officers of law enforcement agencies shall be issued and entitled
to possession of a Massachusetts police identification card by their law enforcement agency, as
authorized by state and federal law, under the same terms and conditions as municipal police
officers and University of Massachusetts police officers. For the purposes of this paragraph, law
of 2

enforcement agencies shall mean public or private colleges, universities or other educational
institutions.
of 2